Massachusetts, session 194th, S432.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 71 of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2022 edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “violence”, in line 22, the following words:- “, prescription
opioid abuse prevention, with an emphasis on the prescription drug epidemic and the connection
between prescription opioid abuse and addiction to other drugs, such as heroin,”.
of 1